Colorado, session 2026A, SB092.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-2-102, amend
(1.5)(a)(I)(A), (1.5)(a)(II)(B), (1.5)(a)(IV)(A), (1.5)(a)(IV)(B),
(1.5)(a)(V)(C), and (1.5)(a)(V)(D) as follows:
30-2-102. Categorization of counties for fixing salaries of county
officers - salary amounts - legislative declaration.
(1.5) (a) For the purpose of establishing the salaries of county
officers whose terms of office begin on or after January 1, 2016:
(I) (A) Category I-A counties consist of the counties of Adams,
Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, Eagle, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, PITKIN,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

Pueblo, Routt, Summit, and Weld;
(II) (B) Category II-B counties consist of the counties COUNTY of
Fremont. and Pitkin.
(IV) (A) Category IV-A counties consist of the counties of Custer,
LAKE, and Prowers;
(B) Category IV-B counties consist of the counties of Kit Carson
Lake, and Washington;
(V) (C) Category V-C counties consist of the counties of Bent and
Dolores CHEYENNE;
(D) Category V-D counties consist of the county of Cheyenne
DOLORES.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-092

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-092